Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 439 Probation and Parole
439.3108.
Modification of conditions of community supervision — Department to reimburse local correctional or detention facilities or residential centers — Imposition of graduated sanctions.

Notwithstanding any administrative regulation or law to the contrary, including KRS 439.340(3)(b), the department or board may:

Modify the conditions of community supervision for the limited purpose of imposing graduated sanctions;

Place a supervised individual who is on probation who violates the conditions of community supervision in a state or local correctional or detention facility or residential center for a period of not more than ten (10) days consecutively, and not more than sixty (60) days in any one (1) calendar year. The department shall reimburse the local correctional or detention facility or residential center for the costs of incarcerating a person confined under this paragraph at the rate specified in KRS

532.100

;

Place a supervised individual serving a period of parole or post-release supervision from prison or jail who violates the conditions of community supervision in a state or local correctional or detention facility or residential center for a period of not more than thirty (30) days consecutively, and not more than sixty (60) days in any one (1) calendar year. The department shall reimburse the local correctional or detention facility or residential center for the costs of incarcerating a person confined under this paragraph at the rate specified in KRS

532.100

; and

Notwithstanding paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, place any supervised individual who violates the conditions of community supervision in a state or local correctional or detention facility or residential center for the period of time a supervised individual awaits admission to a residential alcohol or substance use treatment program. The department shall reimburse the local correctional or detention facility or residential center for the costs of incarcerating a supervised individual serving a period of parole or post-release supervision confined under this paragraph at the rate specified in KRS 532.100.

A probation and parole officer intending to modify the conditions of community supervision by imposing a graduated sanction shall issue to the supervised individual a notice of the intended sanction. The notice shall inform the supervised individual of the technical violation or violations alleged, the date or dates of the violation or violations, and the graduated sanction to be imposed.

The imposition of a graduated sanction or sanctions by a probation and parole officer shall comport with the system of graduated sanctions adopted by the department under KRS

439.3107

. Upon receipt of the notice, the supervised individual shall immediately accept or object to the sanction or sanctions proposed by the officer. The failure of the supervised individual to comply with a sanction shall constitute a violation of community supervision.

If the supervised individual objects to the imposition of the sanction or sanctions, then:

If the supervised individual is serving a period of parole or post-release supervision from prison or jail, then the administrative process promulgated under KRS 439.3107(3) shall apply; or

If the supervised individual is on probation, then the provisions of KRS

533.050

shall apply.

If the graduated sanction involves confinement in a correctional or detention facility:

Confinement shall be approved by the probation and parole district supervisor, but the supervised individual may be taken into custody for up to four (4) hours while such approval is obtained;

If the supervised individual is employed, the probation and parole officer shall, to the extent feasible, impose this sanction on weekend days or other days and times when the supervised individual is not working; and

The supervised individual may be placed on work release for work at his or her place of employment.

A sanction that confines a supervised individual in a correctional or detention facility for a period longer than authorized under subsection (1) of this section, or extends the term of community supervision, shall not be imposed as a graduated sanction, except pursuant to an order of the court or the board.

Upon successful completion of a graduated sanction or sanctions, a court may not revoke the term of community supervision or impose additional sanctions for the same violation.

If a probation and parole officer modifies the conditions of community supervision by imposing a graduated sanction, the officer shall:

Deliver a copy of the modified conditions to the supervised individual;

File a copy of the modified conditions with the sentencing court or releasing authority; and

Note the date of delivery of the copy in the supervised individual’s file or case management system.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 62, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 14, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 44, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

439.3109.
Quarterly review of recommended confinement sanctions.

The probation and parole district supervisor shall review confinement sanctions recommended by probation and parole officers on a quarterly basis to assess any disparities that may exist among officers, evaluate the effectiveness of the sanction as measured by the supervised individuals’ subsequent conduct, and monitor the impact on the department’s number and type of revocations for violations of the conditions of supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 63, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3110.
Pregnancy release conditions for eligible persons reasonably believed to have a substance use disorder.

As used in this section:

“Eligible person” means a person who is:

A pregnant woman;

Reasonably believed by a court or the department to have a substance use disorder;

Not charged or convicted of an offense that would qualify the person as a violent offender under KRS

439.3401

; and

Not charged or convicted of an offense under KRS Chapter 510, KRS

529.100

involving commercial sexual activity, KRS

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a),

531.310

, or

531.320

; and

“Pregnancy release conditions” means conditions of release set by a court or the department for eligible persons which shall include:

Completing inpatient residential treatment for substance use disorders;

Not being charged with a new local, state, or federal misdemeanor or felony offense;

If not yet sentenced, appearing for all required court appearances;

If not yet sentenced, avoiding all contact with any alleged victim and any potential witness who may testify concerning the charge, unless or until the court removes this condition; and

If not yet sentenced, maintaining a current address with the court.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, when an eligible person is charged or convicted of any violation of KRS Chapter 218A, the person shall be released from custody upon her own recognizance so long as the person successfully meets the pregnancy release conditions. If the pregnancy release conditions are violated, the eligible person shall be returned to custody to await sentencing or to serve the sentence for the original conviction under KRS Chapter 218A as well as the sentence for any subsequent charges or convictions, if any.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 115, § 8, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 85, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). Prior to this statute being amended in 2021, subsection (2) contained the opening language, “Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary,”. However, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 3 (SB 84) deleted subsection (3), so the reference to subsection (3) in subsection (2) should have also been deleted to conform, but it wasn’t. In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has deleted “Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and” from subsection (2) and retained “Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary” to correct this manifest clerical or typographical error under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

(7/14/2018). Pursuant to 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 12, that Act shall be known as the Women’s Dignity in the Justice System Act. This statute was created in Section 8 of that Act.

439.315.
Payment of fee by released person — Amount — Waiver of payment — Applicable to persons released by county containing a city of the first class or urban-county government.

A person placed by a releasing authority on probation, parole, or other form of release subject to supervision by the Department of Corrections and all persons supervised pursuant to KRS

439.560

shall pay a fee to offset the costs of supervising the probation, parole, or other supervised release.

The fees shall be as follows:

For a felony, not less than ten dollars ($10) per month while on active supervision nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year.

For a misdemeanor, not less than ten dollars ($10) per month while on active supervision nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) per year, except as provided in subsection (13) of this section.

The releasing authority shall order the fee paid in a lump sum or installments. If the fee is to be paid in a lump sum, the person shall not be released from custody until the fee is paid in full.

Upon the failure of a person to pay an installment on a fee set forth in a release agreement, the releasing authority shall hold a hearing to determine why the installment has not been paid. Failure without good cause to pay an installment pursuant to a release agreement shall be grounds for the revocation of probation, parole, conditional release, or other form of release upon which the person has been released as provided in KRS

533.050

.

The releasing authority shall hold a hearing to determine the ability of the defendant to make the payments; and in making this determination, the releasing authority shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in restitution. In counties containing a city of the first class or an urban-county form of government, the releasing authority may waive the payment of the fee in whole or in part for defendants placed under the supervision of the adult misdemeanant probation and work release program, if it finds that any of the factors in subsection (6) of this section exist.

The releasing authority shall not waive any fee unless the commissioner of the Department of Corrections or his designee petitions the releasing authority in written form for the waiver. The Department of Corrections shall not petition unless:

The offender is a student in a school, college, university, or course of vocational or technical training designed to fit the student for gainful employment. Certification of student status shall be supplied to the releasing authority by the educational institution in which the offender is enrolled. In such case, the fee may be postponed until completion of education but shall be paid thereafter.

The offender has an employment disability, as determined by a physical, psychological, or psychiatric examination acceptable to, or ordered by, the releasing authority.

At any time during the pendency of the judgment or order rendered according to the terms of this section, a defendant may petition the releasing authority to modify or vacate its previous judgment or order on the grounds of change of circumstances with regard to the defendant’s ability to pay the fee. The releasing authority shall advise the defendant of this right at the time of the rendering of the judgment or order placing the defendant on probation, parole, or other supervised release.

All sums paid by the defendant pursuant to this section shall be paid into the general fund, except as provided in subsection (13) of this section.

When granting a release of any defendant by way of probation, parole, or otherwise, the releasing authority shall make the payment of this fee a condition of release, unless the fee has been waived, reduced, or delayed as provided in this section. Nonpayment shall be grounds for revocation of the release as provided in KRS

533.050

.

The releasing authority, if the Department of Corrections petitions the releasing authority to modify the fee, shall consider the petition and may waive the payment of the fee in whole or in part, delay payment of the fee, increase the fee, or deny the petition.

All fees fixed under the provisions of this section shall be collected by the circuit clerk of the county where the defendant is supervised, except as provided in subsection (13) of this section.

The Department of Corrections and the Division of Probation and Parole shall, for each person released under its supervision, keep an account of all payments made and report delinquencies to the releasing authority.

In a city, county, consolidated local government, charter county, or an urban-county government, persons placed by a releasing authority on probation, parole, or other release subject to supervision by the adult misdemeanant probation and work release program of the county, city, consolidated local government, charter county, or urban-county government shall pay a fee to offset the costs of supervising the probation, parole, or other supervised release. The fees shall be assessed by the releasing authority in accordance with the provisions of this section. The fee for a misdemeanant defendant placed under the supervision of an adult misdemeanant probation and work release program of a county, city, consolidated local government, charter county, or an urban-county government shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) per year. All sums paid by the defendant under this subsection shall be paid into the general fund of the county, city, consolidated local government, charter county, or urban-county government in lieu of the payment specified in subsection (8) of this section. All fees fixed under this subsection shall be collected by the circuit clerk of the county or urban-county involved. The adult misdemeanant probation and work release program of the county, consolidated local government, city, charter county, or urban-county government shall, for each person released under its supervision, keep an account of all payments made, maintain copies of all receipts issued by the circuit clerk, and report delinquencies to the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 416, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 211, § 95, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 88, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 418, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 286, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 112, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 234, effective July 15, 2002.

439.320.
Parole board — Members’ qualifications, terms, compensation — Chairperson — Administrative regulations — Quorum.

The Governor shall appoint a Parole Board consisting of nine (9) full-time members to be confirmed by the Senate in accordance with KRS

11.160

. The Governor shall make each appointment from a list of three (3) names given to him or her by the Kentucky State Corrections Commission. Each member appointed to the board shall have had at least five (5) years of actual experience in the field of penology, correction work, law enforcement, sociology, law, education, social work, medicine, or a combination thereof, or have served at least five (5) years previously on the Parole Board. No more than six (6) board members shall be of the same political party. The board shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for administrative purposes only. The Department of Corrections shall provide any clerical, stenographic, administrative, and expert staff assistance the board deems necessary to carry out its duties.

The Governor shall designate one (1) member as chairperson of the board. The member designated as chairperson shall serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the Governor or until his or her term expires.

The members of the board shall give full time to the duties of their office and shall receive necessary traveling expenses and a salary to be determined pursuant to KRS 64.640(2), except the chairperson of the board shall receive additional compensation of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year for his or her services. Their terms of office shall be four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and have qualified. Their successors shall be appointed thereafter as provided in this section for terms of four (4) years, and a vacancy occurring before expiration of the term of office shall be similarly filled for the unexpired term.

The organization of the board shall be determined by the chairperson and shall be consistent with administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

439.340

. For policy and procedural matters, five (5) members shall constitute a quorum. Parole and final parole revocation hearings may be done by panels of the board, subject to the following requirements:

If a two (2) member panel is utilized, both members of the panel shall agree on the decision or the matter shall be referred to the full board;

If a three (3) member panel is utilized, two (2) of the three (3) members of the panel shall agree on a decision or the matter shall be referred to the full board; and

If a panel of four (4) or more members is utilized, a majority of the panel shall agree on a decision or the matter shall be referred to the full board.

The Governor may not remove any member of the board except for disability, inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office. Before removal, he or she shall give the member a written copy of the charges against him or her and shall fix the time when he or she can be heard in his or her defense, which shall not be less than ten (10) days thereafter. Upon removal, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges made against the member and the findings thereupon with a record of the proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 8, effective May 18, 1956; 1963 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4; 1972, ch. 291, § 1; 1976, ch. 83, § 14, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 155, § 159, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 344, § 42, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 412, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 211, § 96, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 179, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 227, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 541, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 298, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 456, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 129, § 1, effective March 18, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 319, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 1, 2008; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 107, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 156, § 12, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 72, § 4, effective June 25, 2013.

439.330.
Duties of board.

The board shall:

Study the case histories of persons eligible for parole, and deliberate on that record;

Conduct reviews and hearings on the desirability of granting parole;

Impose upon the parolee or conditional releasee such conditions as it sees fit;

Order the granting of parole;

Issue warrants for persons charged with violations of parole and postincarceration supervision and conduct hearings on such charges, subject to the provisions of KRS

439.341

,

532.043

, and

532.400

;

Determine the period of supervision for parolees, which period may be subject to extension or reduction after recommendation of the cabinet is received and considered; and

Grant final discharge to parolees.

The board shall adopt an official seal of which the courts shall take judicial notice.

The orders of the board shall not be reviewable except as to compliance with the terms of KRS

439.250

to

439.560

.

The board shall keep a record of its acts, an electronic record of its meetings, a written record of the votes of individual members, and the reasons for denying parole to inmates. These records shall be public records in accordance with KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. The board shall notify each institution of its decisions relating to the persons who are or have been confined therein, and shall submit to the Governor a report with statistical and other data of its work at the close of each fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 9, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(16); 1978, ch. 259, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 208, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 43, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 179, § 4, effective April 4, 1994; 2005, ch. 129, § 3, effective March 18, 2005; 2011, ch. 2, § 87, effective March 3, 2011; 2011, ch. 2, § 101, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011). This section was amended by 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, secs. 87 and 101, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

439.331.
Risks and needs assessment of criminal risk factors of parole-eligible inmates.

The department shall:

Administer a validated risk and needs assessment to assess the criminal risk factors of all inmates who are eligible for parole, or a reassessment of a previously administered risk and needs assessment, before the case is considered by the board;

Provide the results of the most recent risk and needs assessment to the board before an inmate appears before the board; and

Incorporate information from an inmate’s criminal risk and needs assessment into the development of his or her case plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 30, effective June 8, 2011.

439.335.
Scientific means of personality analysis to be used to establish level, intensity, terms, and conditions of supervision.

In considering the granting of parole and the terms of parole, the parole board shall use the results from an inmate’s validated risk and needs assessment and any other scientific means for personality analysis that may hereafter be developed.

The department shall use the results from an inmate’s validated risk and needs assessment and any other scientific means for personality analysis that may hereafter be developed to define the level or intensity of supervision for parole, and to establish any terms or conditions of supervision imposed by the department in accordance with the administrative regulations adopted by the department pursuant to KRS

439.470

or as otherwise authorized by law. The terms and intensity of supervision shall be based on an individual’s level of risk to public safety, criminal risk factors, and the need for treatment and other interventions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 143, § 1; 1998, ch. 606, § 167, effective July 15, 1998; 2011, ch. 2, § 31, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 13, effective July 12, 2012.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although the psychiatric and psychological evaluations found in an inmate’s parole review file are confidential, caution should be exercised upon any examination thereof; the Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee and its staff may have access to the files, but should protect against the general release or publication of the material. Public discussion of this review should scrupulously avoid identification of individual inmates and the opinions expressed in the evaluations with respect to each of them.

OAG 91-86

.

439.340.
Parole of prisoners confined in adult penal or correctional institutions, halfway houses, and reentry centers — Notice of prisoner's parole to be given to certain law enforcement officers, and to victims or their next of kin.

The board may release on parole persons confined in any adult state penal or correctional institution of Kentucky or sentenced felons incarcerated in county jails eligible for parole. All paroles shall issue upon order of the board duly adopted. As soon as practicable after his or her admission to an adult state penal or correctional institution or county jail if he or she is a sentenced felon, and at such intervals thereafter as it may determine, the Department of Corrections shall obtain all pertinent information regarding each prisoner, except those not eligible for parole. The information shall include the results of his or her most recent risk and needs assessment, his or her criminal record, his or her conduct, employment, and the reports of physical and mental examinations that have been made. The Department of Corrections shall furnish the circumstances of his or her offense, the results of his or her most recent risk and needs assessment, and his or her previous social history to the board. The Department of Corrections shall prepare a report on any information it obtains. It shall be the duty of the Department of Corrections to supplement this report with any material the board may request and submit the report to the board.

Before granting the parole of any prisoner, the board shall consider the pertinent information regarding the prisoner, including the results of his or her most recent risk and needs assessment, and shall have him or her appear before it for interview and hearing. The board in its discretion may hold interviews and hearings for prisoners convicted of Class C felonies not included within the definition of “violent offender” in KRS

439.3401

and Class D felonies not included within the definition of “sex crime” in KRS

17.500

. The board in its discretion may request the parole board of another state confining prisoners pursuant to KRS

196.610

to interview eligible prisoners and make a parole recommendation to the board. A parole shall be ordered only for the best interest of society and not as an award of clemency, and it shall not be considered a reduction of sentence or pardon. A prisoner shall be placed on parole only when arrangements have been made for his or her proper employment or for his or her maintenance and care, and when the board believes he or she is able and willing to fulfill the obligations of a law abiding citizen. Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, including KRS

440.330

, when a prisoner is otherwise eligible for parole and the board has recommended parole for that prisoner for the reasons set forth in this subsection, the board may grant parole to any prisoner wanted as a fugitive by any other jurisdiction, and the prisoner shall be released to the detainer from that jurisdiction. Such parole shall not constitute a relinquishment of jurisdiction over the prisoner, and the board in all cases expressly reserves the right to return the prisoner to confinement in a correctional institution of the Commonwealth if the prisoner violates the terms of his or her parole.

A nonviolent offender convicted of a Class D felony with an aggregate sentence of one (1) to five (5) years who is confined to a state penal institution or county jail shall have his or her case reviewed by the Parole Board after serving fifteen percent (15%) or two (2) months of the original sentence, whichever is longer.

Except as provided in this section, the board shall adopt administrative regulations with respect to the eligibility of prisoners for parole, the conduct of parole and parole revocation hearings and all other matters that come before it, or conditions to be imposed upon parolees. Regulations governing the eligibility of prisoners for parole shall be in accordance with professionally accepted ideas of correction and reform and may utilize in part objective, performance-based criteria and risk and needs assessment information; however, nothing herein contained shall preclude the board from utilizing its present regulations in conjunction with other factors involved that would relate to the inmate’s needs and the safety of the public.

The board shall insure that all sentenced felons who have longer than ninety (90) days to serve in state penal institutions, halfway houses, reentry centers, and county jails are considered for parole not less than sixty (60) days prior to their parole eligibility date, and the Department of Corrections shall provide the necessary assistance and information to the board in order for it to conduct timely parole reviews.

In addition to or in conjunction with each hearing conducted under subsection (2) of this section for any prisoner convicted of a Class A, B, or C felony or a Class D felony included within the definition of “sex crime” in KRS

17.500

and prior to the granting of a parole to any such prisoner, the parole board shall conduct a hearing of which the following persons shall receive not less than forty-five (45) nor more than ninety (90) days’ notice: the Commonwealth’s attorney who shall notify the sheriff of every county and the chief of police of every city and county in which the prisoner committed any Class A, B, or C felony or a Class D felony included within the definition of “sex crime” in KRS

17.500

for which he or she is imprisoned, and all identified victims of the crimes or the next of kin of any victim who is deceased. Notice to the Commonwealth’s attorney shall be by mail, fax, or electronic means at the discretion of the board, and shall be in a manner that ensures receipt at the Commonwealth attorney’s business office. Notices received by chiefs of police and sheriffs shall be posted in a conspicuous location where police employed by the department may see it. Notices shall be posted in a manner and at a time that will allow officers to make comment thereon to the Parole Board. Notice to victims or their next of kin shall be made, for prisoners incarcerated prior to July 15, 1986, by mail, fax, or electronic means at the discretion of the board, and shall be in a manner that ensures receipt by the Commonwealth’s attorney, who shall forward the notice promptly to the victims or their next of kin at their last known address. For prisoners incarcerated on or after July 15, 1986, notice to the victims or their next of kin shall be by mail from the Parole Board to their last known address as provided by the Commonwealth’s attorney to the Parole Board at the time of incarceration of the prisoner. For prisoners incarcerated prior to April 1, 2021 for a Class D felony included within the definition of “sex crime” in KRS 17.500, notice to the victims or their next of kin shall be in a manner that ensures receipt by the Commonwealth’s attorney, who shall forward the notice promptly to the victims or their next of kin at their last known address. For prisoners incarcerated on or after April 1, 2021 for a Class D felony included within the definition of “sex crime” in KRS 17.500, notice to the victims or their next of kin shall be by mail from the Parole Board to their last known address as provided by the Commonwealth’s attorney to the Parole Board at the time of incarceration of the prisoner. Notice to the victim or the next of kin of subsequent considerations for parole after the initial consideration shall not be sent if the victim or the next of kin gives notice to the board that he or she no longer wants to receive such notices. The notice shall include the time, date, and place of the hearing provided for in this subsection, and the name and address of a person to write if the recipient of the notice desires to attend the hearing or to submit written comments.

Persons receiving notice as provided for in subsection (5) of this section may submit comments, in person or in writing, to the board upon all issues relating to the parole of the prisoner. The board shall read and consider all comments prior to making its parole decision, if they are received by the board not less than seven (7) days before the date for the hearing. The board shall retain all comments in the prisoner’s permanent Parole Board file, and shall consider them in conjunction with any subsequent parole decisions affecting the prisoner. In addition to officers listed in subsection (5) of this section, the crime victims or the next of kin of any victim who is deceased or who is disabled and cannot attend the hearing or the parent or legal guardian of any victim who is a minor may attend the hearing provided for in subsection (5) of this section and present oral and written comments upon all issues relating to the parole of the prisoner, if they have advised the board, in writing received by the board not less than seven (7) days prior to the date set for the hearing, of their intention to attend the hearing. The board shall receive and consider all comments, shall make a record of them which it shall retain in the prisoner’s permanent Parole Board file, and shall consider them in conjunction with any subsequent parole decision affecting the prisoner. Persons appearing before the Parole Board pursuant to this subsection may elect to make their presentations outside of the presence of the prisoner.

Victims of Class D felonies not included within the definition of “sex crime” in KRS

17.500

may submit comments in person or in writing to the board upon all issues relating to the parole of a prisoner.

Any hearing provided for in subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section shall be open to the public unless the persons having a right to appear before the board as specified in those subsections request closure of hearing for reasons of personal safety, in which event the hearing shall be closed. The time, date, and location of closed hearings shall not be disclosed to the public.

Except as specifically set forth in this section, nothing in this section shall be deemed to expand or abridge any existing rights of persons to contact and communicate with the Parole Board or any of its members, agents, or employees.

The unintentional failure by the Parole Board, sheriff, chief of police, or any of its members, agents, or employees or by a Commonwealth’s attorney or any of his or her agents or employees to comply with any of the provisions of subsections (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall not affect the validity of any parole decision or give rise to any right or cause of action by the crime victim, the prisoner, or any other person.

No eligible sexual offender within the meaning of KRS

197.400

to

197.440

shall be granted parole unless he or she has successfully completed the Sexual Offender Treatment Program.

Any prisoner who is granted parole after completion of the Sexual Offender Treatment Program shall be required, as a condition of his or her parole, to participate in regular treatment in a mental health program approved or operated by the Department of Corrections.

When the board grants parole contingent upon completion of a program, the commissioner, or his or her designee, shall determine the most appropriate placement in a program operated by the department or a residential or nonresidential program within the community approved by the department. If the department releases a parolee to a nonresidential program, the department shall release the parolee only if he or she will have appropriate community housing pursuant to KRS

439.3408

.

If the parole board does not grant parole to a prisoner, the maximum deferment for a prisoner convicted of a non-violent, non-sexual Class C or Class D felony shall be twenty-four (24) months. For all other prisoners who are eligible for parole:

No parole deferment greater than five (5) years shall be ordered unless approved by a majority vote of the full board; and

No deferment shall exceed ten (10) years, except for life sentences.

When an order for parole is issued, it shall recite the conditions thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 10, effective May 18, 1956; 1963 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(15); 1976, ch. 190, § 1; 1978, ch. 259, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 344, § 44, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 382, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 478, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 435, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 97, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 179, § 2, effective April 4, 1994; 1998, ch. 541, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 129, § 2, effective March 18, 2005; 2008, ch. 158, § 2, effective July 1, 2008; 2009, ch. 57, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 107, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 2, § 32, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 91, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 175, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010). 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 107, sec. 12, provides that “The intent of the General Assembly in repealing and reenacting KRS

439.320

,

439.340

, and

532.200

in Sections 4, 5, and 10 of this Act is to affirm the amendments made to these sections in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 158. The specific textual provisions of Sections 4, 5, and 10 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 158 shall be deemed effective as of April 24, 2008, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text from those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.” This statute is affected by that language.